Florida, session 2026, HB279.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Fostering with
Dignity Act."
Section 2. Section 39.4011, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
39.4011 Luggage for children placed in out-of-home care.—
(1)(a) The Legislature finds that children being placed in
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb279-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 279 2026
out-of-home care often transport their personal belongings in
trash bags, which intensifies emotional distress for the child
and reinforces his or her feelings of disposability.
Accordingly, the Legislature intends that every child in this
state being placed in out-of-home care be provided with a
suitable reusable bag, suitcase, or backpack in order to promote
dignity, emotional well-being, and stability during the child's
transition.
(b) This section must be construed to advance the dignity,
emotional well-being, and stability of children being placed in
out-of-home care. This section may not be construed to limit or
impede existing rights, services, or protections afforded to
children in out-of-home care under federal or state law.
(2) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Community-based care lead agency" has the same
meaning as in s. 409.986(3).
(b) "Luggage" means a suitcase, duffel bag, backpack, or
other similar container or bag with handles that is made of
durable material and designed for multiple uses including
holding a person's personal belongings.
(c) "Public-private partnership" means a partnership
between the department and a private entity, the purpose of
which is to finance, build, and operate projects that serve a
public purpose.
(3) Upon taking a child into its custody pursuant to s.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb279-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 279 2026
39.401, the department must provide each child entering out-of-
home care with a suitable piece of luggage for the storage and
transport of his or her personal belongings.
(4) The department shall do all of the following:
(a) Establish and maintain a decentralized supply of
luggage to be used to transport a child's personal belongings.
(b) Develop procedures for the storage and distribution of
luggage.
(c) Collaborate with community-based care lead agencies,
advocacy groups, business partners, or entities in a public-
private partnership with the department to coordinate logistics
and the distribution of pieces of luggage.
(d) Pursue strategic partnerships to ensure that each
child entering out-of-home care receives a piece of luggage to
store and transport the child's personal belongings. The
department may solicit and accept gifts, grants, and donations
of any kind and from any source for purposes of this section.
(e) Provide a piece of luggage to a child who is being
removed from the child's home or changing placements. The piece
of luggage provided to a child under this section belongs to the
child and may not be reclaimed by the department or retained by
the person with whom the child is placed. The department is not
required to provide a new piece of luggage to a child who is
changing placements and has the piece of luggage that was
previously provided by the department.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb279-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 279 2026
(f) Maintain a record of each time a trash bag is used to
move a child's personal belongings. The record must include the
reason the department did not provide the child with an
appropriate piece of luggage to move the child's personal
belongings.
(g) Submit to the Legislature an annual report that
includes the following information:
1. The number of times a trash bag was used to transport a
child's personal belongings and the reason the department did
not provide the child with an appropriate piece of luggage.
2. The department's luggage supply inventory and its
management practices for the supply of luggage maintained by the
department.
(5) Funding for the distribution of pieces of luggage to
children entering out-of-home care may come from any of the
following:
(a) Federal funds, including federal Title IV-E
assistance.
(b) Matching grant program agreements with or donations
from community and business entities.
(c) Public-private partnerships.
(6) Pursuant to s. 402.57(5)(a), the department's direct-
support organization shall collect the funding received under
subsection (5) and use such funding to help administer this
100 section.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb279-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 279 2026
101 Section 3. Subsection (4) of section 39.401, Florida
102 Statutes, is amended to read:
103 39.401 Taking a child alleged to be dependent into
104 custody; law enforcement officers and authorized agents of the
105 department.—
106 (4) When a child is taken into custody pursuant to this
107 section, the department shall:
108 (a) Request that the child's parent, caregiver, or legal
109 custodian disclose the names, relationships, and addresses of
110 all parents and prospective parents and all next of kin of the
111 child, so far as are known.
112 (b) Provide each child entering out-of-home care with a
113 piece of luggage, as defined in s. 39.4011, for the storage and
114 transport of his or her personal belongings.
115 Section 4. Paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section
116 39.4085, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
117 39.4085 Goals for dependent children; responsibilities;
118 education; Office of the Children's Ombudsman.—
119 (1) The Legislature finds that the design and delivery of
120 child welfare services should be directed by the principle that
121 the health and safety of children, including the freedom from
122 abuse, abandonment, or neglect, is of paramount concern and,
123 therefore, establishes the following goals for children in
124 shelter or foster care:
125 (c) To have their privacy protected;, have their personal
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb279-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 279 2026
126 belongings secure and transported with them in a manner that
127 promotes their dignity, emotional well-being, and stability,
128 including the provision of at least one piece of luggage when
129 they are placed in out-of-home care;, and, unless otherwise
130 ordered by the court, have uncensored communication, including
131 receiving and sending unopened communications and having access
132 to a telephone.
133
134 This subsection establishes goals and not rights. This
135 subsection does not require the delivery of any particular
136 service or level of service in excess of existing
137 appropriations. A person does not have a cause of action against
138 the state or any of its subdivisions, agencies, contractors,
139 subcontractors, or agents, based upon the adoption of or failure
140 to provide adequate funding for the achievement of these goals
141 by the Legislature. This subsection does not require the
142 expenditure of funds to meet the goals established in this
143 subsection except those funds specifically appropriated for such
144 purpose.
145 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb279-00